Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-503
Contagious, infectious, or other disease or illness; poisoning; duty of attending physician; violation; penalty.

All attending physicians shall report to the official local health department or the Department of Health and Human Services promptly, upon the discovery thereof, the existence of any contagious or infectious diseases and such other disease, illness, or poisoning as the Department of Health and Human Services may from time to time specify. Any attending physician, knowing of the existence of any such disease, illness, or poisoning, who fails promptly to report the same in accordance with this section, shall be deemed guilty of a Class V misdemeanor for each offense.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. VIII, § 3, p. 780;

C.S.1922, § 8224;

C.S.1929, § 71-2303;

R.S.1943, § 71-503;

Laws 1967, c. 441, § 1, p. 1381;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 150;

Laws 1986, LB 763, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 493;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 381.